District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.04a

Rental Conversion and Sale Division of the Department of Housing and Community Development Rental Conversion and Sale Administrator.

(a)

There is established within the Department of Housing and Community Development the Rental Conversion and Sale Division, which shall have as its head a Rental Conversion and Sale Administrator.

(b)

The Rental Conversion and Sale Administrator shall receive annual compensation equivalent to that received by a District employee compensated at the grade of 15 of the District schedule established under subchapter XI of Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-611.01 et seq.].

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 204a
as added Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(f), 56 DCR 1332

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3401.03 and § 42-3501.03.